Nevada, session 83, AB319-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the State Department of Agriculture the sum of
$43,000,000 for the purpose of awarding grants of money to Nevada
school districts to provide universal free breakfast and lunch to
Nevada pupils.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2025, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 19, 2025, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 19, 2025.
-
*AB319_R1*

– 2 –
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2024.
H
-
*AB319_R1*